Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB297.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1302(23) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and the section is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 1302. Vehicles exempt from registration.The following types of vehicles are exempt from registration:* * *(23) Any all-terrain vehicle exempt from registration under Chapter 77 (relating to snowmobiles and all-terrain vehicles) and operated as an emergency vehicle by a police or fire department or emergency medical services agency when the vehicle does not travel on public highways in excess of two miles and is primarily for off-highway use and only operated incidentally upon [the highway] a highway in a county of the 123456789101112131415161718 first class, a county of the second class, a county of the second class A or a county of the third class. An all-terrain vehicle so operated shall comply with section 4571 (visual and audible signals on emergency vehicles).(24) Any all-terrain vehicle exempt from registration under Chapter 77 and operated as an emergency vehicle by a police or fire department or emergency medical services agency when the vehicle does not travel on public highways in excess of 15 miles and is primarily for off-highway use and only operated incidentally upon a highway in a county of the fourth class, a county of the fifth class, a county of the sixth class, a county of the seventh class or a county of the eighth class. An all-terrain vehicle so operated shall comply with section 4571.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0297PN0241 - 2 - 123456789101112131415